trunk/incubator/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="cirk/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lens</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lers</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lernes</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ka/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tten</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttene</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttens</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttes</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttenes</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spi/l__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llet</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llene</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ls</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llets</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ls</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>llenes</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nø/d__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dden</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dder</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dderne</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ds</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddens</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dders</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ddernes</l>
          <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rs</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rnes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hus__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="baisse"><i>baisse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blotlæggelse"><i>blotlæggelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dagligstue"><i>dagligstue</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="estragoneddike"><i>estragoneddike</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firetageshus"><i>firetageshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forkastelse"><i>forkastelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="godkendelse"><i>godkendelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jættestue"><i>jættestue</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kat"><i>ka</i><par n="ka/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kridthus"><i>kridthus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuldebølge"><i>kuldebølge</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="myte"><i>myte</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nød"><i>nø</i><par n="nø/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="porse"><i>porse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sæbeboble"><i>sæbeboble</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skuldertaske"><i>skuldertaske</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spil"><i>spi</i><par n="spi/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="statuette"><i>statuette</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="styrehus"><i>styrehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tegneserie"><i>tegneserie</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="typegodkendelse"><i>typegodkendelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abonnementsservice"><i>abonnementsservice</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anskueliggørelse"><i>anskueliggørelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bedrøvelse"><i>bedrøvelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="byrde"><i>byrde</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eumenide"><i>eumenide</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fravigelse"><i>fravigelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ildprøve"><i>ildprøve</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="læseferie"><i>læseferie</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opholdskommune"><i>opholdskommune</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rørknogle"><i>rørknogle</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slaskedukke"><i>slaskedukke</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stumpe"><i>stumpe</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tryne"><i>tryne</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aks"><i>aks</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ank"><i>ank</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbejdstit"><i>arbejdstit</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arveonk"><i>arveonk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bars"><i>bars</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bib"><i>bib</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blodmang"><i>blodmang</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boghand"><i>boghand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="budcyk"><i>budcyk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cirk"><i>cirk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dad"><i>dad</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dampked"><i>dampked</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dørtærsk"><i>dørtærsk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fedtkirt"><i>fedtkirt</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="føds"><i>føds</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="form"><i>form</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hand"><i>hand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvirv"><i>hvirv</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kjort"><i>kjort</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konstab"><i>konstab</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mejs"><i>mejs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motorcyk"><i>motorcyk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pend"><i>pend</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reg"><i>reg</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sad"><i>sad</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snirk"><i>snirk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stab"><i>stab</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zob"><i>zob</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aktiebrev"><i>aktiebrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bænk"><i>bænk</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blodbad"><i>blodbad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brøl"><i>brøl</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dal"><i>dal</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dybdemål"><i>dybdemål</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fagblad"><i>fagblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fjeld"><i>fjeld</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="for"><i>for</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrskib"><i>fyrskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grav"><i>grav</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="horehus"><i>horehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kælk"><i>kælk</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="køb"><i>køb</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kurv"><i>kurv</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lugt"><i>lugt</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="navn"><i>navn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="overfald"><i>overfald</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puds"><i>puds</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjippetov"><i>sjippetov</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sminkebord"><i>sminkebord</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="storm"><i>storm</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ting"><i>ting</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="våbenvåningshus"><i>våbenvåningshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
